Mississippi, session 2026, HB745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purposes of this section, "public safety answering point" means that term as defined in Section 19-5-383. (2)  Upon request of a law enforcement agency or a public safety answering point, on behalf of a law enforcement agency, a wireless service provider shall provide call location information concerning the telecommunications device of a user to the requesting law enforcement agency or public safety answering point.  A law enforcement agency or public safety answering point may only request information under this section for the purposes of responding to a call for emergency services or in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical harm. (3)  A wireless service provider may establish protocols by which the provider voluntarily discloses call location information. (4)  A claim for relief may not be brought in any court against any wireless service provider or any other person for providing call location information if acting in good faith under this section. (5)  The Department of Public Safety shall obtain contact information from all wireless service providers authorized to do business in this state to facilitate a request from a law enforcement agency or a public safety answering point on behalf of a law enforcement agency for call location information under this section.  The department shall disseminate the contact information to each public safety answering point in this state. SECTION 2.  Section 19-5-319, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-319.  (1)  Automatic number identification (ANI), automatic location identification (ALI) and geographic automatic location identification (GeoALI) information that consist of the name, address and telephone number of telephone or wireless subscribers shall be confidential, and the dissemination of the information contained in the 911 automatic number and location database is prohibited except for the following purpose:  The information will be provided to the Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP) on a call-by-call basis only for the purpose of handling emergency calls or for training, and any permanent record of the information shall be secured by the Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP) and disposed of in a manner which will retain that security, except upon court order or subpoena from a court of competent jurisdiction or as otherwise provided by law. (2)  All emergency telephone calls and telephone call transmissions received pursuant to Section 19-5-301 et seq., and all recordings of the emergency telephone calls, shall remain confidential and shall be used only for the purposes as may be needed for law enforcement, fire, medical rescue or other emergency services.  These recordings shall not be released to any other parties without court order or subpoena from a court of competent jurisdiction. (3)  PSAP and emergency response entities shall maintain and, upon request, release a record of the date of call, time of call, the time the emergency response entity was notified, and the identity of the emergency response entity.  The emergency response entity shall maintain and, upon request, release a record of the date and time the call was received by the emergency response entity and the time the emergency response entity arrived on the scene.  Requests for release of records must be made in writing and must specify the information desired. Requestors shall pay the cost of providing the information requested in accordance with the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, Section 25-61-1 et seq.  The identity of any caller or person or persons who are the subject of any call, or the address, phone number or other identifying information about any such person, shall not be released except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.